Washington statutes.
RCW 15.70.040

Powers of director—In general.

The director of agriculture is authorized and empowered to:

(1) Collect, compromise, adjust, or cancel claims and obligations arising out of or administered under this chapter or under any mortgage, lease, contract, or agreement entered into or administered pursuant to this chapter and if, in his or her judgment, necessary and advisable, pursue the same to final collection in any court having jurisdiction;

(2) Bid for and purchase at any execution, foreclosure, or other sale, or otherwise to acquire property upon which the director of agriculture has a lien by reason of judgment or execution, or which is pledged, mortgaged, conveyed, or which otherwise secures any loan or other indebtedness owing to or acquired by the director of agriculture under this chapter; and

(3) Accept title to any property so purchased or acquired; to operate or lease such property for such period as may be deemed necessary to protect the investment therein; and to sell or otherwise dispose of such property in a manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

The authority herein contained may be delegated to the secretary of agriculture of the United States with respect to funds or assets authorized to be administered and used by him or her under agreements entered into pursuant to RCW 15.70.020.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6099; 1961 c 11 s 15.70.040. Prior: 1951 c 169 s 4.]